Idaho statutes. Title 50 MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS
Chapter 6
MAYOR

Sec.

§ 50-601. Qualifications.

Any person shall be eligible to hold the office of mayor who is a qualified elector of the city at the time his declaration of candidacy or declaration of intent is submitted to the city clerk and remains a qualified elector during his term of office.

The term of office of mayor shall be for a period of four (4) years except as otherwise specifically provided. He shall take office at the time and in the manner provided for installation of councilmen.

§ 50-602. Mayor, administrative official.

The mayor, except as provided in sections 50-801 through 50-812[, Idaho Code], shall be the chief administrative official of the city, preside over the meetings of the city council and determine the order of business subject to such rules as the council may prescribe, have a vote only when the council is equally divided, have the superintending control of all the officers and affairs of the city, preserve order, and take care that the ordinances of the city and provisions of this act are complied with and enforced.

§ 50-603. Messages to council.

The mayor shall, from time to time, communicate to the city council such information and recommend such measures as, in his opinion, may tend to the improvement of the finances, the protection, the health, the security, the ornament, the comfort, and the general welfare and prosperity of the city.

§ 50-604. Special meetings of council.

The mayor shall have the power to call special meetings of the city council, the object of which shall be submitted to the council in writing; the call and object, as well as the disposition thereof, shall be entered upon the journal by the clerk.

§ 50-605. Accounts and reports of officers.

The mayor shall have the power, when he deems it necessary, to require any officer of the city to exhibit his accounts or other papers, and to make written reports pertaining to his office to the council.

§ 50-606. Police powers of mayor.

The mayor shall have such jurisdiction as may be vested in him by ordinance over all places within five (5) miles of the corporate limits of the city, for the enforcement of any health or quarantine ordinance and regulation thereof, and shall have jurisdiction in all matters vested in him by ordinance, except taxation, within one (1) mile of the corporate limits of said city and over such properties as may be owned by the city without the corporate limits.

§ 50-607. General powers.

The mayor shall have and exercise such powers, prerogatives and authority as is conferred by the laws of the state of Idaho or as may be conferred upon him by the city council, and shall have the power to administer oaths, and shall sign all contracts and conveyances in the name of and on behalf of the city.

§ 50-608. Vacancy in office of mayor.

In case of a temporary vacancy in the office of mayor due to absence or disability, the president of the council shall exercise the office of mayor during such disability or temporary absence, and until the mayor shall return. When a vacancy occurs in the office of mayor by reason of death, resignation or permanent disability, the city council shall fill the vacancy from within or without the council as may be deemed in the best interests of the city, which appointee shall serve until the next general city election, at which election a mayor shall be elected for the full four (4) year term.

§ 50-609. Mayor may require aid in enforcing law.

The mayor is hereby authorized to call on every resident in the city over twenty-one (21) years of age to aid in enforcing the laws.

§ 50-610. Remission of fines. [Repealed.]

§ 50-611. Veto power.

The mayor shall have power to veto or sign any ordinance passed by the city council; provided, that any ordinance vetoed by the mayor may be passed over his veto by a vote of one-half (1/2) plus one (1) of the members of the full council, notwithstanding the veto, and should the mayor neglect or refuse to sign any ordinance, and return the same with his objections, in writing, at the next regular meeting of the council, the same shall become law without his signature.

§ 50-612. Majority required for election — Runoff election.

A city may, by ordinance, provide that a majority of the votes for any candidate running for the office of mayor shall be required for election to that office. In the event no candidate receives a majority of the votes cast, there shall be a runoff election between the two (2) candidates receiving the highest number of votes cast. Such runoff election shall be conducted by the county clerk as in the general election in a manner consistent with chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code, and at such time, within thirty (30) days of the general election, as prescribed by the city and shall be exempt from the limitation upon elections provided in sections 34-106 and 50-405, Idaho Code. The ballot shall be prepared by the county clerk not less than twenty-two (22) days preceding the runoff election. The designation of polling places shall be made by the county commissioners not less than twenty (20) days preceding any runoff election and sample ballots shall be printed not less than eighteen (18) days preceding the runoff election.